Louisiana, session 2026, HB979.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1665(C)(1) and 1665.2(C)(1) are hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
§1665. Financial security for surviving spouses and children of firemen in certain
cases
* * *
C.(1) In any case in which a fireman suffers death as a result of an injury
arising out of and in the course of the performance of his official duties as a fireman,
or arising out of any activity while on or off duty, in his capacity as a fireman, in the
protection of life and property, the sum of two hundred fifty three hundred thousand
dollars shall be paid to the surviving spouse of the fireman or, if not survived by a
spouse, the sum of two hundred fifty three hundred thousand dollars shall be paid to
the surviving child or children or, if not survived by a spouse nor a child or children,
then the sum of two hundred fifty three hundred thousand dollars shall be paid to the
named beneficiary listed on the fireman's designation form or, if there is no
beneficiary designation form at the time of the fireman's death, and no surviving
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 979 ENROLLED
spouse nor a child or children, then the sum of two hundred fifty three hundred
thousand dollars shall be paid to the fireman's estate. Each fireman shall complete
a beneficiary designation form. In addition, if the fireman is survived by a dependent
child or children, the sum of fifty thousand dollars shall be paid for each of the
dependent children, such sums to be paid to the duly appointed and qualified tutor
or the legal representative of the child or children. Payment shall be made by the
state risk manager out of the Self-Insurance Fund created in R.S. 39:1533(A).
* * *
§1665.2. Financial security for surviving spouses and children of law enforcement
officers in certain cases
* * *
C.(1) In any case in which a law enforcement officer suffers death as a result
of any injury arising out of and in the course of the performance of his official duties
as such officer, or arising out of any activity, while on or off duty, in his capacity as
a law enforcement officer, in the protection of life or property, the sum of two
hundred fifty three hundred thousand dollars shall be paid to the surviving spouse of
each officer or, if not survived by a spouse, the sum of two hundred fifty three
hundred thousand dollars shall be paid to the surviving child or children or, if not
survived by a spouse nor a child or children, then the sum of two hundred fifty three
hundred thousand dollars shall be paid to the named beneficiary listed on the officer's
beneficiary designation form or, if there is no designation form at the time of the
officer's death, and no surviving spouse nor a child or children, then the sum of two
hundred fifty three hundred thousand dollars shall be paid to the officer's estate. Each
officer shall complete a beneficiary designation form. In addition, if the officer is
survived by a dependent child or children, the sum of fifty thousand dollars shall be
paid for each of the dependent children, such sums to be paid to the duly appointed
and qualified tutor or the legal representative of the child or children. Payment shall
be made by the state risk manager out of the Self-Insurance Fund created in R.S.
39:1533(A).
* * *
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 979 ENROLLED
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall apply to any qualifying death occurring
on or after July 1, 2025, for which a claim is approved by the Law Enforcement Officers and
Firemen's Survivor Benefit Review Board, regardless of whether the claim was approved
before or after the effective date of this Act.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026; if vetoed by the governor
and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on July 1,
2026, or on the day following such approval by the legislature, whichever is later.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.